Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3009
Violations; penalties.

(1) Any distributor or operator who places a cash device into operation in the State of Nebraska without the necessary decal being placed conspicuously upon it or without having obtained the necessary license shall be subject to an administrative penalty of up to one thousand dollars per day for each unlicensed cash device.

(2) Any cash device which does not have the necessary decal conspicuously displayed upon it shall be subject to being sealed by the Tax Commissioner or his or her delegate. If such seal is broken prior to payment of the occupation tax upon such cash device, the cash device shall be subject to forfeiture and sale by the Tax Commissioner.

(3) Any person violating the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day on which any person engages in or conducts the business of operating or distributing the mechanical amusement devices subject to the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, without having paid the tax or obtained the required license as provided, shall constitute a separate offense.

(4) The department has the authority to levy an administrative penalty of up to one thousand dollars per day for any other violation of the act.

Laws 1969, c. 635, § 9, p. 2545;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 245;

Laws 1977, LB 353, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 4, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 317, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB685, § 15.